Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2305
Center, defined.

Center means a call center which shall have as its principal purpose the statewide receipt and dissemination to participating operators of information on a fair and uniform basis concerning intended excavations by excavators in areas where operators have underground facilities.

Laws 1994, LB 421, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB462, § 3.